Florida, session 2026, SB1500.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 43 44 Section 1.âSection 655.933, Florida Statutes, is amended to 45 read: 46 655.933âAccess by fiduciaries.âIf a safe-deposit box is 47 made available by a lessor to one or more persons acting as 48 fiduciaries, the lessor may, except as otherwise expressly 49 provided in the lease or the writings pursuant to which such 50 fiduciaries are acting, allow access thereto as follows: 51 (1)âMust allow access to the safe-deposit box by any one or 52 more of the persons acting as personal representatives who 53 present the lessor with a copy of the letters of administration; 54 and. 55 (2)âMay allow access to the safe-deposit box by: 56 (a)âAny one or more of the persons otherwise acting as 57 fiduciaries if authorized in writing, which writing is signed by 58 all other persons so acting; or. 59 (b)(3)âBy Any agent authorized in writing, which writing is 60 signed by all persons acting as fiduciaries. 61 Section 2.âSubsection (1) of section 655.936, Florida 62 Statutes, is amended to read: 63 655.936âDelivery of safe-deposit box contents or property 64 held in safekeeping to personal representative.â 65 (1)âSubject to the provisions of subsection (3), the lessor 66 shall: 67 (a)âImmediately deliver to a personal representative 68 appointed by a court in this state, upon presentation of a 69 certified copy of his or her letters of authority, all property 70 deposited with it by the decedent for safekeeping;, and shall 71 (b)âGrant the personal representative access to any safe 72 deposit box in the decedentâs name and allow permit him or her 73 to remove from such box any part or all of the contents thereof; 74 and 75 (c)âAllow the personal representative or the personal 76 representativeâs attorney to pay the accumulated charges and 77 terminate the lease. 78 Section 3.âSection 733.603, Florida Statutes, is amended to 79 read: 80 733.603âPersonal representative to proceed without court 81 order.âA personal representative shall proceed expeditiously 82 with the settlement and distribution of a decedentâs estate and, 83 except as otherwise specified by this code or ordered by the 84 court, shall do so without adjudication, order, or direction of 85 the court. A personal representative may invoke the jurisdiction 86 of the court to resolve questions concerning the estate or its 87 administration or to enforce the authority of a personal 88 representative conferred by this code. 89 Section 4.âSubsection (28) is added to section 733.612, 90 Florida Statutes, to read: 91 733.612âTransactions authorized for the personal 92 representative; exceptions.âExcept as otherwise provided by the 93 will or court order, and subject to the priorities stated in s. 94 733.805, without court order, a personal representative, acting 95 reasonably for the benefit of the interested persons, may 96 properly: 97 (28)âInstitute a proceeding to enforce his or her authority 98 as personal representative as conferred by this code. 99 Section 5.âSection 733.6125, Florida Statutes, is created 100 to read: 101 733.6125âProceedings to enforce authority.âIn any 102 proceeding to enforce the authority of a personal representative 103 as conferred by this code, the court shall award to a prevailing 104 personal representative taxable costs as in chancery actions, 105 including attorney fees. When awarding taxable costs and 106 attorney fees under this section, the court may direct payment 107 from any person whose action or inaction necessitated the 108 enforcement proceeding or from any person having an interest in 109 the estate and may enter a judgment that may be satisfied from 110 other property. 111 Section 6.âParagraph (b) of subsection (2) and subsection 112 (6) of section 733.6171, Florida Statutes, are amended, and 113 paragraph (l) is added to subsection (4) of that section, to 114 read: 115 733.6171âCompensation of attorney for the personal 116 representative.â 117 (2) 118 (b)âAn attorney representing a personal representative in 119 an estate administration who intends to charge a fee based upon 120 the schedule set forth in subsection (3) shall make the 121 following disclosures in writing to the personal representative: 122 1.âThere is not a mandatory statutory attorney fee for 123 estate administration. 124 2.âThe attorney fee is not required to be based on the size 125 of the estate, and the presumed reasonable fee provided in 126 subsection (3) may not be appropriate in all estate 127 administrations. 128 3.âThe fee is subject to negotiation between the personal 129 representative and the attorney. 130 4.âThe selection of the attorney is made at the discretion 131 of the personal representative, who is not required to select 132 the attorney who prepared the will. 133 5.âThe personal representative is shall be entitled to a 134 summary of ordinary and extraordinary services rendered for the 135 fees agreed upon at the conclusion of the representation. The 136 summary must shall be provided by counsel and must shall consist 137 of the total hours devoted to the representation or a detailed 138 summary of the services performed during the representation. 139 (4)âSubject to subsection (2), in addition to fees for 140 ordinary services, the attorney for the personal representative 141 shall be allowed further reasonable compensation for any 142 extraordinary service. What is an extraordinary service may vary 143 depending on many factors, including the size and complexity of 144 the estate. Extraordinary services may include, but are not 145 limited to: 146 (l)âInvolvement in any proceeding to enforce the authority 147 of a personal representative as conferred by this code. 148 (6)âIf a separate written agreement regarding compensation 149 exists between the attorney and the decedent, the attorney must 150 shall furnish a copy to the personal representative before prior 151 to commencement of employment, and, if employed, must shall 152 promptly file and serve a copy on all interested persons. A 153 separate agreement or a provision in the will suggesting or 154 directing that the personal representative retain a specific 155 attorney does not obligate the personal representative to employ 156 the attorney or obligate the attorney to accept the 157 representation, but if the attorney who is a party to the 158 agreement or who drafted the will is employed, the compensation 159 paid may shall not exceed the compensation provided in the 160 agreement or in the will. 161 Section 7.âSubsection (2) of section 735.201, Florida 162 Statutes, is amended to read: 163 735.201âSummary administration; nature of proceedings. 164 Summary administration may be had in the administration of 165 either a resident or nonresident decedentâs estate, when it 166 appears: 167 (2)âThat the value of the entire estate subject to 168 administration in this state, less the value of property exempt 169 from the claims of creditors, does not exceed $150,000 $75,000 170 or that the decedent has been dead for more than 2 years. 171 Section 8.âSubsection (1) of section 735.302, Florida 172 Statutes, is amended to read: 173 735.302âIncome tax refunds in certain cases.â 174 (1)âIn any case when the United States Treasury Department 175 determines that an overpayment of federal income tax exists and 176 the person in whose favor the overpayment is determined is dead 177 at the time the overpayment of tax is to be refunded, and 178 notwithstanding irrespective of whether the decedent had filed a 179 joint and several or separate income tax return, the amount of 180 the overpayment, if not in excess of $5,000 $2,500, may be 181 refunded as follows: 182 (a)âDirectly to the surviving spouse on his or her verified 183 application; or 184 (b)âIf there is no surviving spouse, to one of the 185 decedentâs children who is designated in a verified application 186 purporting to be executed by all of the decedentâs children over 187 the age of 14 years. 188 189 In either event, the application must show that the decedent was 190 not indebted, that provision has been made for the payment of 191 the decedentâs debts, or that the entire estate is exempt from 192 the claims of creditors under the constitution and statutes of 193 the state, and that no administration of the estate, including 194 summary administration, has been initiated and that none is 195 planned, to the knowledge of the applicant. 196 Section 9.âSubsection (2), paragraph (c) of subsection (3), 197 and subsection (4) of section 735.303, Florida Statutes, are 198 amended to read: 199 735.303âPayment to successor without court proceedings.â 200 (2)âA financial institution in this state may pay to the 201 family member of a decedent, without any court proceeding, 202 order, or judgment, the funds on deposit in all qualified 203 accounts of the decedent at the financial institution if the 204 total amount of the combined funds in the qualified accounts at 205 the financial institution do not exceed an aggregate total of 206 $2,000 $1,000. The financial institution may not make such 207 payment earlier than 6 months after the date of the decedentâs 208 death. 209 (3)âIn order to receive the funds described in subsection 210 (2), the family member must provide to the financial institution 211 a certified copy of the decedentâs death certificate and a sworn 212 affidavit that includes all of the following: 213 (c)âA statement attesting that the total amount in all 214 qualified accounts held by the decedent in all financial 215 institutions known to the affiant does not exceed an aggregate 216 total of $2,000 $1,000. 217 (4)âThe family member may use an affidavit in substantially 218 the following form to fulfill the requirements of subsection 219 (3): 220 221 AFFIDAVIT UNDER 222 SECTION 735.303, FLORIDA STATUTES, 223 TO OBTAIN BANK PROPERTY OF DECEASED 224 ACCOUNT HOLDER: ...(Name of decedent)... 225 State of ............ 226 County of ............ 227 228 Before the undersigned authority personally appeared ...(name of 229 affiant)..., of ...(residential address of affiant)..., who has 230 been sworn and says the following statements are true: 231 (a)âThe affiant is (initial one of the following 232 responses): 233 .... The surviving spouse of the decedent. 234 .... A surviving adult child of the decedent, and the 235 decedent left no surviving spouse. 236 .... A surviving adult descendant of the decedent, and the 237 decedent left no surviving spouse and no surviving adult child. 238 .... A surviving parent of the decedent, and the decedent 239 left no surviving spouse, no surviving adult child, and no 240 surviving adult descendant. 241 (b)âAs shown in the certified death certificate, the date 242 of death of the decedent was ...(date of death)..., and the 243 address of the decedentâs last residence was ...(address of last 244 residence).... 245 (c)âThe affiant is entitled to payment of the funds in the 246 decedentâs depository accounts and certificates of deposit held 247 by the financial institution ...(name of financial 248 institution).... The total amount in all qualified accounts held 249 by the decedent in all financial institutions known to the 250 affiant does not exceed an aggregate total of $2,000 $1,000. The 251 affiant requests full payment from the financial institution. 252 (d)âA personal representative has not been appointed to 253 administer the decedentâs estate, and no probate proceeding or 254 summary administration procedure has been commenced with respect 255 to the estate. 256 (e)âThe affiant has no knowledge of any last will and 257 testament or other document or agreement relating to the 258 distribution of the decedentâs estate. 259 (f)âThe payment of the funds constitutes a full release and 260 discharge of the financial institution regarding the amount 261 paid. 262 (g)âThe affiant understands that he or she is personally 263 liable to the creditors of the decedent and other persons 264 rightfully entitled to the funds under the Florida Probate Code, 265 to the extent the amount paid exceeds the amount properly 266 attributable to the affiantâs share. 267 (h)âThe affiant understands that making a false statement 268 in this affidavit may be punishable as a criminal offense. 269 270 By ...(signature of affiant)... 271 272 Sworn to and subscribed before me this .... day of 273 .... by ...(name of affiant)..., who is personally 274 known to me or produced .... as identification, and 275 did take an oath. 276 277 ...(Signature of Notary Public - State of Florida)... 278 ...(Print, Type, or Stamp Commissioned Name of Notary 279 Public)... 280 My commission expires: ...(date of expiration of 281 commission)... 282 283 Section 10.âSubsection (1) of section 735.304, Florida 284 Statutes, is amended to read: 285 735.304âDisposition without administration of intestate 286 property in small estates.â 287 (1)âNo Administration is not shall be required and or 288 formal proceedings may not be instituted upon the estate of a 289 decedent who has died intestate leaving only personal property 290 exempt under the provisions of s. 732.402, personal property 291 exempt from the claims of creditors under the State 292 Constitution, and nonexempt personal property the value of which 293 does not exceed the sum of $20,000 $10,000 and the amount of 294 preferred funeral expenses and reasonable and necessary medical 295 and hospital expenses of the last 60 days of the last illness, 296 provided the decedent has been deceased for more than 1 year and 297 no administration of the decedentâs estate is pending in this 298 state. 299 Section 11.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 300 made by this act to section 655.933, Florida Statutes, in a 301 reference thereto, paragraph (b) of subsection (1) of section 302 655.937, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read: 303 655.937âAccess to safe-deposit boxes leased in two or more 304 names.â 305 (1)âUnless specifically provided in the lease or rental 306 agreement to the contrary, if a safe-deposit box is rented or 307 leased in the names of two or more lessees, access to the safe 308 deposit box will be granted to: 309 (b)âSubject to s. 655.933, those persons named in s. 310 655.933. 311 Section 12.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 312 made by this act to section 655.936, Florida Statutes, in a 313 reference thereto, subsection (4) of section 734.101, Florida 314 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 315 734.101âForeign personal representative.â 316 (4)âExcept as provided in s. 655.936, all persons indebted 317 to the estate of a decedent, or having possession of personal 318 property belonging to the estate, who have received no written 319 demand from a personal representative or curator appointed in 320 this state for payment of the debt or the delivery of the 321 property are authorized to pay the debt or to deliver the 322 personal property to the foreign personal representative after 323 the expiration of 90 days from the date of appointment of the 324 foreign personal representative. 325 Section 13.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 326 made by this act to section 733.6171, Florida Statutes, in a 327 reference thereto, subsection (4) of section 733.106, Florida 328 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 329 733.106âCosts and attorney fees.â 330 (4)âIf costs and attorney fees are to be paid from the 331 estate under this section, s. 733.6171(4), s. 736.1005, or s. 332 736.1006, the court, in its discretion, may direct from what 333 part of the estate they shall be paid. 334 (a)âIf the court directs an assessment against a personâs 335 part of the estate and such part is insufficient to fully pay 336 the assessment, the court may direct payment from the personâs 337 part of a trust, if any, if a pour-over will is involved and the 338 matter is interrelated with the trust. 339 (b)âAll or any part of the costs and attorney fees to be 340 paid from the estate may be assessed against one or more 341 personsâ part of the estate in such proportions as the court 342 finds to be just and proper. 343 (c)âIn the exercise of its discretion, the court may 344 consider the following factors: 345 1.âThe relative impact of an assessment on the estimated 346 value of each personâs part of the estate. 347 2.âThe amount of costs and attorney fees to be assessed 348 against a personâs part of the estate. 349 3.âThe extent to which a person whose part of the estate is 350 to be assessed, individually or through counsel, actively 351 participated in the proceeding. 352 4.âThe potential benefit or detriment to a personâs part of 353 the estate expected from the outcome of the proceeding. 354 5.âThe relative strength or weakness of the merits of the 355 claims, defenses, or objections, if any, asserted by a person 356 whose part of the estate is to be assessed. 357 6.âWhether a person whose part of the estate is to be 358 assessed was a prevailing party with respect to one or more 359 claims, defenses, or objections. 360 7.âWhether a person whose part of the estate is to be 361 assessed unjustly caused an increase in the amount of costs and 362 attorney fees incurred by the personal representative or another 363 interested person in connection with the proceeding. 364 8.âAny other relevant fact, circumstance, or equity. 365 (d)âThe court may assess a personâs part of the estate 366 without finding that the person engaged in bad faith, 367 wrongdoing, or frivolousness. 368 Section 14.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.